src/phon-smn.xfst
                            m b %^ b -> %^SL m p p %^ p ,
                            n d %^ d -> %^SL n t t %^ t ,
                            n g %^ g -> %^SL ŋ k k %^ k ,
                            n j %^ j -> %^SL n j j %^ j ,
                          m h p %^ p -> %^SL m M M %^ p ,
                            m s %^ s -> %^SL m s s %^ s ,
                            n s %^ s -> %^SL n s s %^ s ,
                          n h k %^ k -> %^SL ŋ Ŋ Ŋ %^ k ,
                          n h t %^ t -> %^SL n N N %^ t ,
                          n h c %^ c -> %^SL n N N %^ t s ,
                          n h č %^ č -> %^SL n N N %^ t š ,
                            m v %^ v -> %^SL m v v %^ v ,
                            m š %^ š -> %^SL m š š %^ š ,
                            n š %^ š -> %^SL n š š %^ š ,
                            n z %^ z -> %^SL n t t %^ t s ,
                            n ž %^ ž -> %^SL n t t %^ t š ,

                            đ b %^ b -> %^SL đ p p %^ p , 
                            đ g %^ g -> %^SL đ k k %^ k , 
                            đ j %^ j -> %^SL đ j j %^ j , 
                            đ v %^ v -> %^SL đ v v %^ v , 

                            v t %^ t -> %^SL v V V %^ t ,
                            v k %^ k -> %^SL v V V %^ k ,
                            v p %^ p -> %^SL v V V %^ p ,
                            v c %^ c -> %^SL v V V %^ t s ,
                            v č %^ č -> %^SL v V V %^ t š ,

                              p %^ p -> %^SL p p   %^ p	 ,
                              t %^ t -> %^SL t t   %^ t	 ,
                              k %^ k -> %^SL k k   %^ k	 ,
                              c %^ c -> %^SL t t   %^ t s ,
                              č %^ č -> %^SL t t   %^ t č 
                              
   || [.#.|Cns|[Vow - [e|o]]] [Vow - á] _  [ [i|u] [ [ Cns - j ] | .#. ] | á | a a ] ;
   
! Eventually double the SecondaryLenghtening rule with a SecondaryLenghteningForLongA with á in left context and ii (long i) in right: váccii (-secleng) : vácci (+secleng)



define SecondaryLengtheningNas  p %^ m   ->  %^SL p p %^ m ,
                                t %^ n   ->  %^SL t t %^ n ,
                                t %^ n j ->  %^SL t t %^ n j ,
                                k %^ ŋ   ->  %^SL k k %^ ŋ                                                          
                                || [.#.|Cns|[Vow - [e|o]]] [Vow - á] [r|j|đ] 
                                 _ [ [i|u] [ [ Cns - j ] | .#. ] | á | a a ]  ;


! Svakt stadium (her må vi liste konsonantpara)
define WeakGrade l r %^ r -> l r r %^ r ,
                           l b %^ b   -> l p p %^ p ,   
                           l f %^ f   -> l f f %^ f ,   
                           l g %^ g   -> l k k %^ k ,   
                           l j %^ j   -> l j j %^ j ,   
                         l h k %^ k   -> l L L %^ k ,   
                         l h p %^ p   -> l L L %^ p ,   
                           l s %^ s   -> l s s %^ s ,   
                           l v %^ v   -> l v v %^ v ,   
                           l m %^ m   -> l m m %^ m ,   
                           l n %^ n   -> l n n %^ n ,   
                           l ŋ %^ ŋ   -> l ŋ ŋ %^ ŋ ,   
                           l n %^ n j -> l ɲ ɲ %^ ɲ ,   
                           l š %^ š   -> l š š %^ š , 
                         l h t %^ t   -> l L L %^ t , 
                         l h c %^ c   -> l L L %^ t s , 
                         l h č %^ č   -> l L L %^ t š , 
                           l z %^ z   -> l t t %^ t s , 
                           l ž %^ ž   -> l t t %^ t š , 
             						  	    
                           r b %^ b   -> r p p %^ p ,
                           r d %^ d   -> r t t %^ t ,
                           r f %^ f   -> r f f %^ f ,
                           r g %^ g   -> r k k %^ k ,
                           r j %^ j   -> r j j %^ j ,
                         r h p %^ p   -> r R R %^ p ,
                           r s %^ s   -> r s s %^ s ,
                         r h k %^ k   -> r R R %^ k ,
                         r h t %^ t   -> r R R %^ t ,
                         r h c %^ c   -> r R R %^ t s ,
                         r h č %^ č   -> r R R %^ t š ,
                           r v %^ v   -> r v v %^ v ,
                           r š %^ š   -> r š š %^ š ,
                           r z %^ z   -> r t t %^ t s ,
                           r ž %^ ž   -> r t t %^ t š ,
									  	    
                           m b %^ b   -> m p p %^ p ,
                           n d %^ d   -> n t t %^ t ,
                           n g %^ g   -> ŋ k k %^ k ,
                           n j %^ j   -> n j j %^ j ,
                         m h p %^ p   -> m M M %^ p ,
                           m s %^ s   -> m s s %^ s ,
                           n s %^ s   -> n s s %^ s ,
                         n h k %^ k   -> ŋ Ŋ Ŋ %^ k ,
                         n h t %^ t   -> n N N %^ t ,
                         n h c %^ c   -> n N N %^ t s ,
                         n h č %^ č   -> n N N %^ t š ,
                           m v %^ v   -> m v v %^ v ,
                           m š %^ š   -> m š š %^ š ,
                           n š %^ š   -> n š š %^ š ,
                           n z %^ z   -> n t t %^ t s ,
                           n ž %^ ž   -> n t t %^ t š ,
             						  	    
                           đ b %^ b   -> đ p p %^ p , 
                           đ g %^ g   -> đ k k %^ k , 
                           đ j %^ j   -> đ j j %^ j , 
                           đ v %^ v   -> đ v v %^ v ,
                           
                           j m %^ m   -> j m m %^ m , 
                           j n %^ n   -> j n n %^ n , 
                           
                           v n %^ n   -> v n n %^ n , 
                           v n %^ n j -> v ɲ ɲ %^ ɲ , 		  	    
                           v t %^ t   -> v V V %^ t ,
                           v k %^ k   -> v V V %^ k ,
                           v p %^ p   -> v V V %^ p ,
                           v c %^ c   -> v V V %^ t s ,
                           v č %^ č   -> v V V %^ t š
                               
                   || [.#.|Cns|[Vow - [e|o]]] [Vow - á] 
                   _  [ [i|u] [ [ Cns - j ] | .#. ] | á | a a ]  ;

define HighVowelLenghtening i -> i i , u -> u u || .#. Syll (Cns) Cns* _ ( [Cns - j] ) .#. ;


define StrongNasalClusters m %^ p -> m m %^ M p ,
                           n %^ t -> n n %^ N t ,
                           n %^ k -> n n %^ N k ,
                           n %^ c -> n n %^ N t s ,
                           n %^ č -> n n %^ N t š 
                           || Vow _ Vow ;

! Allegro former... Hva gjør vi med dem?
! Viss det er former som berre er allegro i visse delar av setninga, men ikkje
! elles, må vi ta dei som del av syntaksen på noko vis.
! Viss dei er allegro i samansetjingar må vi gå til leksikon



define VzzRule z %^ z -> d %^ t s , 
               ž %^ ž -> d %^ t š , 
               b %^ b -> b %^ p   , 
               d %^ d -> d %^ t   , 
               g %^ g -> g %^ k   || Vow _ Vow ;
define zzRule  z %^ z -> t %^ t s , 
               ž %^ ž -> t %^ t š ,
               b %^ b -> p %^ p   , 
               d %^ d -> t %^ t   , 
               g %^ g -> k %^ k   || Cns _ Vow ;
             ! Bled by previous

define bdgRule b -> p , d -> t , g -> k || [.#.|%-] _ Vow ;

define VzRule   z              -> d s , 
                ž              -> d š        || Vow %^ _ Vow ;
define CttjRule č %^ č         -> h %^ t š , 
                c %^ c         -> h %^ t s ,
                t š %^ t š     -> h %^ t š , 
                t s %^ t s     -> h %^ t s 
                                                || Vow Cns (h)  _ ;
define ttjRule  č %^ č         -> t %^ t š   , 
                c %^ c         -> t %^ t s   || Vow _ ;
define cRule    c              -> t s , 
                č              -> t š ;

!gávc^ci (line 367 ka:vht.tsi: -> ka:vh.tsi:
! no får vi: kɑɑvhts.tsii
!utan cRule: kɑːvhc.ciː 

define VowelLengthening e -> e e , i -> i i , o -> o o , u -> u u 
                             || .#. (Cns*) _ (h) %^ Cns Vow [Cns | .#. ] ;

define VowelShortening á -> a || _ h h ; ! this should be generalised.
                                         !from aahhtšii to ahhtšii

define DiphthongShorteningIIIGr  i -> ĭ , e -> ĕ , u -> ŭ , o -> ŏ 
                                 || _ [e|a|o] 
                                      [[ h h | m m | n n | ŋ ŋ | đ đ | 
                                         l l | s s | š š | j j | v v | 
                                         Cns ə ] %^ ] ;

 
define DiphthongShorteningSecLng  i e -> ĭ ĕ , e a -> ĕ ă , u o -> ŭ ŏ , o a -> ŏ ă 
                                 || _ Cns* %^SL ;

echo << Dialectal rules >>

!define dhRule đ -> r ; ! Moving from Karesuando to Kautokeino
!define thRule ŧ -> s ;

define eaRule a -> ä || [e|ĕ] _ ;

define aaRule á -> a a ;

define PronounLenghtening u -> u u || .#. [m|t|s] _ .#. ;


echo << And now we go for some OUTPUTFORMAT or another >>

! The rules above are somewhat oriented towards the orthography, and rearrange
! based upon that. Now, we might want to have output in different formats for 
! different reasons:
! SAMPA   = for the Helsinki tts engine
! IPA     = so that we may read it during development
! FINNISH = to target the fallback Bitlips demo if we are not able to meet the
!           October deadline with the generated Sámi voice.

!The idea is to comment out two of the following three rules and keep the one intended.


! ... here outputformat is SAMPA:              
!define OUTPUTFORMAT ə -> %@ , ä -> %{ , æ -> %{ , ö -> 2 , ø -> 2 , a -> A , 
!                   n j -> J , ŋ -> N , š -> S , đ -> D ,  ŧ -> T , ɟ -> J \ , 
!              L -> l %_ %0 , R -> r %_ %0 , M -> m %_ %0 , N -> n %_ %0 , 
!              Ŋ -> N %_ %0 , V -> v %_ %0 ,
!               %^ -> %. ;
! note potential problems with J\.

! ... here outputformat is IPA:              
 define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ , ä -> æ , ö -> ø , n j -> ɲ , š -> ʃ , đ -> ð , ŧ -> θ ,
                     L -> l̥ , R -> r̥ , M -> m̥ , N   -> n̥ , Ŋ -> ŋ̊ , V -> v̥ , 
                     %^ -> %. ;

! ... here outputformat is FUPA:
! define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ , n j -> ń , đ -> ð ,
!                                          
!                     %^ -> %. ;



define COLONLENGTH   ɑ ɑ -> ɑ ː , e e -> e ː , i i -> i ː , o o -> o ː , u u -> u ː ,
                     b b -> b ː , d d -> d ː , f f -> f ː , g g -> g ː , 
                     h h -> h ː , j j -> j ː , k k -> k ː , l l -> l ː , m m -> m ː ,
                     n n -> n ː , p p -> p ː , r r -> r ː , s s -> s ː , t t -> t ː ,
                     v v -> v ː ,
                     l̥ l̥  -> l̥ ː , r̥ r̥  -> r̥ ː , m̥ m̥ -> m̥ ː , n̥ n̥ -> n̥ ː , 
                     ŋ̊ ŋ̊ -> ŋ̊ ː , v̥ v̥ -> v̥ ː ;


! ... here outputformat is Finnish orthography:              
! define OUTPUTFORMAT ŋ -> n g , ŧ -> s , đ -> r , š -> s ,
!                       %^ -> %.  ;
! This rule is incomplete!

! Cleaning up

define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;


echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [ 
!    POSTAG .o. 
    down 

.o. ijRule

.o. slRule

.o. StrongGrade
.o. olju
.o. FinalLightT
.o. FinalLightD
.o. sClusterWeak
.o. StopCluster  
.o. tkRule  
.o. tmRule  

.o. 3rdSylld
.o. rSchwa
.o. dSchwa
.o. lSchwa

.o. Preaspiration
.o. jPreaspiration

.o. LatusLengthening
.o. WeakGrade
.o. PrimaryLenghtening
.o. SecondaryLengthening
.o. SecondaryLengtheningNas
.o. WeakGrade
.o. PlosiveDevoicing
.o. HighVowelLenghtening
.o. StrongNasalClusters

.o. VzzRule
.o. zzRule
.o. VzRule
.o. bdgRule
.o. CttjRule
.o. ttjRule
.o. cRule
.o. LongPalatalAffricate
.o. ShortPalatalAffricate  

.o. VowelLengthening
.o. VowelShortening
.o. DiphthongShorteningIIIGr
.o. DiphthongShorteningSecLng

.o. eaRule
.o. aaRule
.o. PronounLenghtening
